Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB263.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 217 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 4 of this Act:
(1) "Administer" means to directly give glucagon;
(2) "Authorized entity" means a public, private, or parochial school that has a
trained individual who is:
(a) Present on the premises or officially associated with the entity; and
(b) Trained as required under Section 2 of this Act to administer undesignated
glucagon;
(3) "Diabetes medical management plan" means a written, individualized diabetes
care plan prepared by the student's treating diabetes practitioner or practitioner
team that prescribes or directs how the student's diabetes needs may be met in the
school setting, including the administration of undesignated glucagon;
(4) "Pharmacist" has the same meaning as in KRS 315.010;
(5) "Practitioner" has the same meaning as in KRS 217.015;
(6) "Trained individual" means a school employee or contractor who has
successfully completed an approved education training program under KRS
158.838; and
(7) "Undesignated glucagon" means glucagon prescribed in the name of an
authorized entity in accordance with Sections 1 to 4 of this Act.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 217 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A practitioner, acting within the practitioner's scope of practice, may prescribe
undesignated glucagon in the name of an authorized entity for use in accordance
with this section.
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 1/5/2026 6:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 479
(2) A pharmacist may dispense undesignated glucagon for a prescription issued in
the name of an authorized entity.
(3) A trained individual may administer undesignated glucagon in an emergency
situation when a school nurse or other licensed practitioner is not immediately
available and the trained individual believes in good faith that a student is
experiencing severe hypoglycemia or other conditions noted in that student's
diabetes medical management plan.
(4) An authorized entity that acquires and stocks a supply of undesignated glucagon
with a valid prescription shall:
(a) Store the undesignated glucagon in accordance with the manufacturer's
instructions, in a location that is immediately accessible to trained
individuals, and with any additional requirements established by the
Department for Public Health; and
(b) Require a school nurse or a trained individual to be responsible for the
storage, maintenance, and general oversight of the undesignated glucagon
acquired by the authorized entity.
(5) Any authorized entity or trained individual that acquires and stocks a supply of
undesignated glucagon in accordance with this section shall notify the assigned
school nurse or other school health care provider, an agent of the local
emergency medical services, and the local emergency communications or
dispatch center of the existence, location, and type of glucagon acquired.
(6) Any authorized entity or trained individual that administers or provides
undesignated glucagon to a student who is experiencing severe hypoglycemia or
other conditions noted in that student's diabetes medical management plan shall
contact the student's parent, guardian, or emergency contact, and local
emergency medical services as soon as possible.
(7) The requirements of subsection (6) of this section shall not apply to any
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 1/5/2026 6:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 479
individual who administers or provides undesignated glucagon if that individual
is acting as a Good Samaritan under KRS 313.035 and 411.148.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 217 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Any authorized entity or trained individual that, in good faith and without
compensation, renders emergency care or treatment by the use of undesignated
glucagon under Sections 1 to 4 of this Act shall be immune from civil liability for
any personal injury resulting from the care or treatment, or resulting from any
act or failure to act in providing or arranging further medical treatment, if the
person acts as an ordinary, reasonably prudent person would have acted under
the same or similar circumstances.
(2) The immunity under subsection (1) of this section applies to:
(a) A practitioner who prescribes or authorizes the emergency use of
undesignated glucagon;
(b) A pharmacist who fills a prescription for undesignated glucagon;
(c) A trained individual who administers or provides undesignated glucagon;
(d) An authorized entity that acquires and stocks undesignated glucagon, or
provides undesignated glucagon to a trained individual; and
(e) An individual trainer or training entity providing the required training to a
trained individual.
(3) The immunity under subsection (1) of this section shall not apply if the personal
injury results from the gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct of the
person rendering the care or treatment.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 217 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The Cabinet for Health and Family Services, in consultation with the American
Diabetes Association, shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 1/5/2026 6:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 479
KRS Chapter 13A to establish requirements and procedures to implement Sections 1 to
4 of this Act.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 1/5/2026 6:20 PM Jacketed